Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4909.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1205a. (1) The owner of a school of cosmetology, or the owner of a cosmetology establishment that conducts an apprenticeship program, shall ensure that the school or apprenticeship program meets all of the following requirements: (a) A student or apprentice is not required to be in attendance for more than 40 hours per week. (b) A daily record of the attendance of each student or apprentice is maintained and a copy of the record is sent to the department monthly.on request. (c) A record of the enrollment of each student or apprentice is maintained and a copy of the record is sent to the department monthly. (d) (c) A grading system for students or apprentices is established. (e) (d) A student or apprentice is required to pass an examination before the owner of the school or establishment certifies to the department that he or she the student or apprentice has completed training. (f) (e) A student or apprentice is only permitted to practice on members of the public only after he or she the student or apprentice completes at least not less than 350 hours of instruction in the general cosmetology curriculum, including both theory and practical hours. A student or apprentice in a natural hair cultivation, manicuring, skin care, or electrology curriculum may only practice on the public only after he or she the student or apprentice completes at least not less than 1/4 of the hours required by the applicable curriculum, including both theory and practical hours. (g) (f) Before the school begins training a student, or the establishment accepts an apprentice, the owner of the school or establishment obtains proof that the student or apprentice has a high school education, or the equivalent of a high school education. This subdivision does not apply to a student who is enrolling in a program offered as a part of the regular curriculum of a public school and approved by the state board of education. (h) (g) Before the school begins training a student, or the establishment accepts an apprentice, the owner of the school or establishment submits an application to the department on behalf of the student or apprentice. The owner of the school or establishment shall retain a copy of the proof of education described in subdivision (f), (g), if applicable, and the application described in this subdivision in the records of the school or establishment until the student or apprentice applies for examination to obtain a license. (2) The owner of a cosmetology establishment that conducts an apprenticeship program shall not charge a fee for the teaching of cosmetology services to apprentices on the premises. (3) The owner of a cosmetology establishment where 1 apprentice has been successfully trained may allow the training of additional apprentices at the establishment, except that not more than 2 apprentices may be trained at the same time. (4) If the location of a cosmetology establishment where an apprenticeship program is conducted changes, the owner of the cosmetology establishment may continue the apprenticeship program at the new location if a new license is issued under section 1204(4), and an apprentice who was receiving training at the original location may continue to receive training at the new location. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect 90 days after the date it is enacted into law.